Wyoming, session 2025, HB0035.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-212, 9-1-802(e),
22-2-101(a)(iii), 22-2-110(a), 22-2-111(a), 22-18-103,
22-18-105 through 22-18-109, 22-18-111(a)(intro) and
(iii)(intro) and 28-1-106 are amended to read:

HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
9-1-212. Vacancy in office of governor; term of
successor; when election held to fill unexpired term;
requirements of elections; term of person elected.

Whenever the powers and duties of the office of the
governor of the state of Wyoming devolve upon any other
person as provided in W.S. 9-1-211(a), the person acting as
governor shall continue to act as governor until the end of
the term of the governor if the office is assumed less than
sixty (60) days before the next general election. If the
office is assumed more than sixty (60) days before a
general election the person acting as governor shall issue
an additional proclamation calling for the election of a
governor to fill the unexpired term, which election shall
take place at the same time as the general election, and
the election, together with the returns and canvass
thereof, shall be conducted in all respects as though it
was an original election for governor. When the state
canvassing board canvasses the vote of the election and
declares a person at the election to be elected as
governor, the person call for a special election as
provided in W.S. 22-18-103 through 22-18-109. The candidate
issued a certificate of election under W.S. 22-18-109
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
shall, within thirty (30) days after the canvass issuance
of the certificate, or as soon thereafter as possible,
qualify and assume the duties and powers of governor, and
shall be the governor of the state of Wyoming for the
remainder of the unexpired term of the governor.

9-1-802. Election; term; qualifications; full-time;
private practice prohibited; exception; salary; vacancies.

(e) A vacancy in the office of district attorney
shall be filled by the board or boards of county
commissioners under the procedure for filling vacancies in
the office of a member of the state legislature or state
senator established by W.S. 22-18-111 22-18-111(a)(iii)(A)
through (D). Vacancies shall be filled until the next
general election and the appointee shall be qualified
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

22-2-101. Applicability and construction of Election
Code generally.

(a) Chapters 1 through 28 of this Election Code apply
to the following elections:
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191

(iii) Special elections to fill vacancies in the
office of representative in congress under W.S. 22-18-103
through 22-18-109, provided that the provisions of W.S.
22-18-103 through 22-18-109 shall control if inconsistent
with chapters 1 through 28 of this Election Code;

22-2-110. Computing periods of time.

(a) Except for special elections to fill vacancies
for a congressman under W.S. 22-18-105 22-18-103 through
22-18-109, periods of time are computed by excluding the
specific day and counting the prescribed number of days,
including Saturdays, Sundays and full legal holidays. If
the first day of a time period falls on a Saturday, Sunday
or full legal holiday, the preceding day which is not a
Saturday, Sunday or full legal holiday shall be used. If
the last day of a time period falls on a Saturday, Sunday
or full legal holiday, the next day which is not a
Saturday, Sunday or full legal holiday shall be used. All
days, except the specific day, but including the last day,
shall be used to compute the time limits established under
W.S. 22-18-105 22-18-103 through 22-18-109 unless the last
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
day of a time period falls on a Saturday, Sunday or full
legal holiday in which case the next day which is not a
Saturday, Sunday or full legal holiday shall be used.

22-2-111. Employees time off to vote.

(a) Any person entitled to vote at any primary or
general election or special election to fill a vacancy in
the office of representatives in the congress of the United
States under W.S. 22-18-103 through 22-18-109 is, on the
day of such election, entitled to absent himself from any
service or employment in which he is then engaged or
employed for a period of one (1) hour, other than meal
hours, the hour being at the convenience of the employer,
between the time of opening and closing of the polls. Such
elector shall not, because of so absenting himself, lose
any pay, providing he actually casts his legal vote.

22-18-103. Filling vacancies in federal and state
offices; generally.

A vacancy in the office of United States senator,
representative in congress, member of the state legislature
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
or an elected state official shall be filled for the
unexpired term at a special election called for the purpose
by the governor, provided the vacancy does not occur within
six (6) months of the next general election as provided in
W.S. 22-18-103 through 22-18-109. For purposes of W.S.
22-18-103 through 22-18-109, "vacated office" means an
office specified in this section.

22-18-105. Filling vacancy of congressman; whether
filled at general or special election; procedure.

(a) If the Except for temporary appointments in W.S.
22-18-111 and except for vacancies in the office of a
member of the state legislature within the time specified
in W.S. 22-18-111(a)(iii), a vacancy in the office of
representative in congress that occurs within six (6)
months prior to the next general election, the vacancy the
following time period shall be filled at the general
election:. Otherwise

(i) Six (6) months of the next general election
for the office of United States senator or representative
in congress;
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191

(ii) Three (3) months of the next general
election for the office of a member of the state
legislature, secretary of state, state auditor, state
treasurer or superintendent of public instruction;

(iii) Sixty (60) days of the next general
election for the office of governor.

(b) A vacancy that occurs outside the time period
specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be filled
for the unexpired term at a special election. Unless the
Tuesday falls on a full legal holiday, the special election
shall occur on the first Tuesday next following the:

(i) Eighty-ninth day after the vacancy occurs,
unless that for the office of United States senator or
representative in congress;

(ii) Thirty-ninth day after the vacancy occurs
for the office of a member of the state legislature,
secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer or
superintendent of public instruction;
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191

(iii) Twenty-ninth day after the vacancy occurs
for the office of governor.

(c) If the Tuesday falls on a full legal holiday, in
which case the special election shall occur on the next
Tuesday which that is not a full legal holiday.

(d) The governor or acting governor pursuant to W.S.
9-1-211 and 9-1-212 shall declare the a vacancy and issue
the a writ of election within five (5) days after the
vacancy occurs. The writ shall be issued to the county
clerk of each county voting for the office and to the
secretary of state. The writ shall specify the day of the
election.

22-18-106. Filling vacancies in federal and state
offices; nominations.

An elector qualified to hold the a vacated office of
representative in congress shall may be nominated by the
state central committee of the respective parties to fill a
vacancy for the unexpired term of that office filing a
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
signed petition in substantially the form specified in W.S.
22-5-301(a). Nominations from such parties shall be filed
with the secretary of state and fees paid within seven (7)
days after the vacancy is officially declared. Independent
candidates shall file an application and pay the filing fee
with the secretary of state within seven (7) days after the
vacancy is officially declared.

22-18-107. Filling vacancies in federal and state
offices; certification of candidates.

Within five (5) days after the end of the candidate filing
period specified in W.S. 22-18-106, the secretary of state
shall certify to the clerks of counties voting to fill the
vacancy the name of each candidate qualified to appear on
the ballot, and his the candidate's party affiliation or
independent status, if declared.

22-18-108. Filling vacancies in federal and state
offices; party requirements.

A candidate for the unexpired term of the a vacated office
of representative in congress may seek election only as a
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
candidate of the political party in which he the candidate
was registered on the date the vacancy occurred. A
candidate for the unexpired term of a vacated office of
representative in congress who was not registered with a
party on the date the vacancy occurred may run only as an
independent.

22-18-109. Conduct of special election; preparation
of ballot.

A special election to fill a vacancy shall be conducted by
the county clerk as nearly as possible in the manner of a
general election. The county clerk shall have twelve (12)
days to prepare the special election ballot after the
secretary of state's certification under W.S. 22-18-107.
The candidate who receives a plurality of the votes at a
special election shall be issued a certificate of election
as provided by law.

22-18-111. Vacancies in other offices; temporary
appointments.

HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
(a) Any vacancy in any other elective office in the
state except representative in congress or the offices
specified in W.S. 22-18-103 or the board of trustees of a
school or community college district, shall be filled by
the governing body, or as otherwise provided in this
section, by appointment of a temporary successor. The
person appointed shall serve until a successor for the
remainder of the unexpired term is elected at the next
general election and takes office on the first Monday of
the following January. Provided Except as provided in W.S.
22-18-105, if a vacancy in a four (4) year term of office
occurs in the term's second or subsequent years after the
first day for filing an application for nomination pursuant
to W.S. 22-5-209, no election to fill the vacancy shall be
held and the temporary successor appointed shall serve the
remainder of the unexpired term. The following apply:

(iii) Notwithstanding W.S. 22-18-103 through
22-18-109, if a vacancy occurs in the office of a member of
the state legislature not more than forty-five (45) days
before the first day of the general or budget session of
the legislature:

HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
28-1-106. Resignation of office.

(a) Resignation of the office of a member of the
senate or house of representatives shall be made to the
governor, who shall immediately notify the following of the
resignation:

(i) The secretary of state, who shall notify the
county clerks of the counties in which the legislative
district is located;

(ii) The presiding officer of the house of which
the person is a member;

(iii) If the resignation occurs in the time
periods specified in W.S. 22-18-111(a)(iii), the state
central committee of the party which the member represented
at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or
at the time of his appointment if not elected to office.,
of the resignation. If the resigning member did not
represent a political party at the time of his election, or
at the time of his appointment if not elected to office,
the governor shall notify the appropriate boards of county
HB0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0191
commissioners who shall proceed in accordance with W.S.
22-18-111(a)(iii)(C).

(b) For purposes of this section, a person shall be
considered to "represent" a political party if he the
person was a nominee of that political party when elected
to office or when appointed to fill a vacancy in office.

Section 2. W.S. 22-18-104 and 22-18-111(a)(i) are
repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0035